Washington statutes.
RCW 38.12.095

Appointment or promotion of commissioned officers to be made by officer promotion board—Exceptions.

Whenever a commissioned officer is to be appointed or promoted either to fill a vacancy in the organized militia (Washington army national guard, Washington air national guard and the Washington state guard) or for any other reason, the officer to be appointed or promoted shall be selected by the officer promotion board. This selection in no way will change the powers of the governor under RCW 38.12.060. This section in no way applies to appointments or promotions to adjutant general or assistant adjutant general, to the appointment of officers to the rank of captain, lieutenant, or warrant officer, or to the promotion of second lieutenants, first lieutenants, or warrant officers.

[ 1989 c 19 s 16; 1974 ex.s. c 34 s 1.]